Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6246.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) The Michigan travel commission is created within the department of commerce.labor and economic opportunity. All of the statutory authority, powers, duties, functions and responsibilities, including the functions of budgeting, procurement, personnel, and management related functions of the commission that were transferred by executive reorganization order to another state entity are transferred to the commission. (2) The commission shall must consist of 13 members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor shall select members who are experienced in the travel, tourism, and recreation industry or an associated field. Members of the commission shall must be representative of all geographic areas of the this state. Not less fewer than 7 members of the commission shall must be owners and operators of for-profit businesses from the private sector of the travel, tourism, and recreation industry and shall must be experienced in the travel, tourism, and recreation industry. Of the 7 members appointed from the private sector, not less fewer than 4 members shall must be owners and operators of small businesses. As used in this section, "small businesses" means business concerns incorporated or doing business in this state which that employ not more than 100 full-time or part-time employees. (3) A member of the commission shall must be appointed for a term of 4 years. No A member may not serve more than 2 full 4-year terms. A vacancy on the commission shall must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (4) The members of the commission shall serve without compensation. However, members of the commission may be reimbursed for their expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties not to exceed 25 days in a fiscal year pursuant to in accordance with the standard travel regulations of the department of technology, management, and budget. (5) The commission shall recommend by name the appointment of the travel bureau director to the director of the department of commerce, labor and economic opportunity, and elect from its membership annually a chair and vice-chair. The commission shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently if requested by 8 or more members, or at the call of the chair. (6) A member of the commission may be removed from office by the governor in accordance with section 10 of article V of the state constitution of 1963. (7) A majority of the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of the commission. A majority vote of the members present and serving is required for official action of the Michigan travel commission. (8) The business of the Michigan travel commission shall must be conducted at a public meeting of that the commission, held in compliance with the open meetings act, Act No. 267 of the Public Acts of 1976, being sections 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. of the Michigan Compiled Laws. (9) A document prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the Michigan travel commission in the performance of an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, Act No. 442 of the Public Acts of 1976, being sections 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. of the Michigan Compiled Laws. Sec. 2a. The travel bureau is created within the department of commerce and labor and economic opportunity. All of the statutory authority, powers, duties, functions and responsibilities, including the functions of budgeting, procurement, personnel, and management related functions of the travel bureau that were transferred by executive reorganization order to another state entity are transferred to the travel bureau. The travel bureau shall do all of the following: (a) Implement programs to market this state as a desirable travel destination. (b) Before funding a promotional effort, identify and document those benefits to the this state that the travel bureau determines likely to result from the promotional effort. (c) Withhold funds for any proposed promotional effort that in the travel bureau's determination will not likely benefit the travel industry in the this state or conform with the goals of the master plan described in section 2c. (d) If the travel bureau expends funds for a promotional effort, identify and document the actual benefits, if any, conferred upon the on this state by that promotional effort. (e) Use reasonable means to identify, review, and comment upon on the policies and programs of state agencies which that directly affect the achievement of the duties and responsibilities of the travel bureau. (f) Facilitate travel to and within this state to the maximum extent feasible. (g) From time to time, convene interagency committees, consisting of representatives of units of state government that may be required to devise recommendations to identify and solve tourism problems. (h) Provide informational assistance and guidance to regional, county, and city tourism development organizations and similar private organizations in planning programs to attract visitors. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6026 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.